Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 414.578 is amended to read:
414.578. (1) A  community health improvement plan adopted by a coordinated care organization
and its community advisory  council in accordance with ORS 414.577 shall include a component for
addressing the health  of children and youth in the areas served by the coordinated care organization
including, to the extent practicable, a strategy and a plan for:
(a) Working with programs developed by the Early Learning Council, Early Learning  Hubs, the
Youth Development Council and the school health providers in the region; and
(b) Coordinating the effective and efficient delivery of  health care to children and adolescents
in the community.
(2) A  community health improvement plan must be based on research, including research into
adverse childhood  experiences, and must identify funding sources and additional funding necessary
to address the health needs of children and adolescents in the  community and to meet the goals of
the plan. The plan must also:
(a) Evaluate the adequacy of the  existing school-based health resources including school-based
health centers and school nurses to meet the specific pediatric and adolescent health care needs  in
the community;
(b) Make recommendations to improve  the school-based health center and school nurse system,
including the addition or improvement of electronic medical records and billing systems;
(c) Take into consideration whether integration of school-based health  centers with the larger
health system or system of community clinics would further advance the goals of the plan;
(d) Improve the integration of all  services provided to meet the needs of children, adolescents
and families;
(e) Focus on primary care, behavioral health and oral health; and
(f) Address promotion of health and prevention and early intervention in  the treatment of chil-
dren and adolescents.
(3) A coordinated care organization shall  involve in the development of its community health
improvement plan, school-based health centers, school nurses, school mental  health providers and
individuals representing:
(a) Programs developed by the Early Learning Council and Early Learning Hubs;
(b) Programs developed by the Youth Development Council in the region;
Enrolled Senate Bill 846 (SB 846-A) Page 1
(c) The Healthy Start Family Support Services program in the region;
(d) The Cover All People program and other medical assistance programs;
(e) Relief nurseries in the region;
(f) Community health centers;
(g) Oral health care providers;
(h) Community mental health providers;
(i) Administrators of county health  department programs that offer preventive health services
to children;
(j) Hospitals in the region; and
(k) Other appropriate child and adolescent health program administrators.
(4) The Oregon Health Authority may provide incentive grants to coordinated care organizations
for the purpose of contracting with individuals or organizations  to help coordinate integration
strategies identified in the community health improvement plan adopted by the community  advisory
council. The authority may  also provide funds to coordinated care organizations to improve systems
of services that will promote the implementation of the plan.
(5) Each coordinated care organization shall report to the  authority, in the form and manner
prescribed by the authority, on the progress of the integration  strategies and implementation of the
plan for working with the programs developed by the Early Learning Council, Early Learning  Hubs,
the Youth Development Council and school health care providers  in the region, as part of the de-
velopment and implementation of the community health  improvement plan. [ The authority shall
compile the information  biennially and report the information to the Legislative Assembly by December
31 of each even-numbered  year. ] The authority shall monitor statewide progress and the
progress of each coordinated care organization related to working with communities and
community programs toward improving equitable access to care and the quality of care  for
children and youth in the areas served by coordinated care organizations. No later than De-
cember 31 of each even-numbered year, the  authority shall submit a report to the Legislative
Assembly that describes the authority’s findings under this subsection.
Passed by Senate April 9, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 846 (SB 846-A) Page 2